District of Columbia statutes.
25-338

Limitation on successive applications after denial.

(a)

A second and each subsequent application for the same class of license for the same person or persons shall not be considered within 5 years of a denial.

(b)

If an application is withdrawn for good cause, as determined by the Board, before the timely filing of a protest, or if the first application was denied for purely technical or procedural reasons, as determined by the Board, another application by the same applicant for a license of the same class at the same premises may be made at any time.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959